Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,156
Foreign corporation; withdrawal.

(a) A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state may not withdraw from this state until it obtains a certificate of withdrawal from the Secretary of State.

(b) A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state may apply for a certificate of withdrawal by delivering an application to the Secretary of State for filing. The application must set forth:

(1) The name of the foreign corporation and the name of the state or country under whose law it is incorporated;

(2) That it is not transacting business in this state and that it surrenders its authority to transact business in this state;

(3) That it revokes the authority of its registered agent to accept service on its behalf and consents that service of process in any proceeding based on a cause of action arising during the time it was authorized to do business in this state may thereafter be made on such corporation outside this state; and

(4) A mailing address at which process against the corporation may be served.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 156.